nb: Tapefinish: Krepp; Glanset; Matt; Sateng; Glatt; Teksturert; Annet
el: Φινίρισμα ταινίας: Κρεπ; Γυαλιστερό; Ματ; Σατινέ; Λείο; Με υφή; Άλλο
bg-BG: Покритие на лентата: Креп; Гланц; Мат; Сатен; Гладко; Релефно; Друго
cs: Povrchová úprava pásky: Krepová; Lesklá; Matná; Saténová; Hladká; Texturovaná; Jiné
pt-PT: Acabamento da fita: Crepe; Brilhante; Mate; Acetinado; Liso; Texturizado; Outro
en: Tape finish: Crepe; Gloss; Matte; Satin; Smooth; Textured; Other
ko: 테이프 유형: 크레이프; 유광; 무광; 새틴; 스무스; 텍스처; 기타
th: เทปปิดผิว: เครป; เงา; ด้าน; ซาติน; เรียบ; มีเท็กซ์เจอร์; อื่นๆ
vi: Hoàn thiện băng keo: Nhăn; Bóng; Mờ; Satin; Nhẵn; Có kết cấu; Khác
it: Finitura del nastro: Crespato; Lucido; Opaco; Satinato; Liscio; Testurizzato; Altro
de: Oberflächenfinish des Bands: Krepp; Glänzend; Matt; Satin; Glatt; Strukturiert; Sonstige
nl: Tape afwerking: Crêpe; Glans; Mat; Satijn; Glad; Getextureerd; Overig
fr: Finition du ruban: Crêpé; Brillant; Mat; Satiné; Lisse; Texturé; Autre
tr: Bant yüzey bitişi: Krep; Parlak; Mat; Saten; Düz; Dokulu; Diğer
pl: Wykończenie taśmy: Krepowane; Błyszczące; Matowe; Satynowe; Gładkie; Teksturowane; Inne
sv: Tejpfinish: Krusig; Glansig; Matt; Satin; Slät; Texturerad; Annat
zh-CN: 胶带表面效果: 皱纹; 光面; 哑光; 缎面; 光滑; 纹理; 其他
pt-BR: Fita acabamento: Crepe; Brilhante; Fosco; Cetim; Liso; Texturizado; Outro
ja: テープ仕上げ: クレープ; 光沢; マット; サテン; スムース; テクスチャード; その他
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava pásky: Krepová; Lesklá; Matná; Saténová; Hladká; Štruktúrovaná; Iné
lt-LT: Juostos apdaila: Krepinė; Blizgi; Matinė; Satininė; Lygi; Tekstūrinė; Kita
hr-HR: Završna obrada trake: Krep; Sjajno; Mat; Saten; Glatko; Teksturirano; Ostalo
ru: Отделка поверхности ленты: Креп; Глянцевая; Матовая; Сатиновая; Гладкая; Текстурированная; Другое
hu: Ragasztószalag felülete: Krepp; Fényes; Matt; Szatén; Sima; Texturált; Egyéb
ro-RO: Finisajul benzii: Creponat; Lucios; Mat; Satinat; Neted; Texturat; Altele
es: Acabado de la cinta: Crepé; Brillante; Mate; Satinado; Liso; Texturizado; Otro
zh-TW: 膠帶表面處理: 皺紋; 亮面; 霧面; 緞面; 平滑; 紋理; 其他
fi: Teipin viimeistely: Kreppi; Kiiltävä; Matta; Satiini; Sileä; Kuvioitu; Muu
da: Tapefinish: Crepe; Blank; Mat; Satin; Glat; Struktureret; Andet
sl-SI: Končni izgled traku: Krep; Sijaj; Mat; Saten; Gladko; Teksturirano; Drugo